Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,219
Facility emergency coordinator.

Within thirty days after the establishment of a committee for the emergency planning district in which a reporting facility is located, the owner or operator of the facility shall provide to the committee the name of a facility representative who will participate in the emergency planning process as a facility emergency coordinator. The owner or operator of the facility shall promptly inform the committee of any relevant changes occurring at the facility as changes occur or are expected to occur. Upon request from the committee, the owner or operator of the facility shall promptly provide information to the committee which is necessary for developing and implementing the emergency plan.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 29.